Tennessee, session 114, HB2025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 7, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The board of regents, each state university board, and the board of trustees
for the University of Tennessee system shall designate and maintain on the main
campus of each public institution of higher education governed by the board, a courtyard
to be known as the "Charlie Kirk Memorial Courtyard for Civil Debate" to remind
students, faculty, staff, and visitors of the value of civil discourse and to encourage those
who visit the courtyard to exchange differing ideas and opinions with civility and respect.
(b) A Charlie Kirk Memorial Courtyard for Civil Debate required in subsection (a)
must:
(1) Measure forty feet (40') by forty feet (40') or any reasonable
configuration of those dimensions so long as the total dimensions of the
courtyard are no less than one thousand six hundred square feet (1,600 sq. ft.);
(2) Display the declaration of rights in Article I of the Tennessee
Constitution in its entirety on the northern side of the courtyard;
(3) Display the Ten Commandments in their entirety on the southern side
of the courtyard;
(4) Display the Bill of Rights in its entirety on the eastern side of the
courtyard;
(5) Display the Declaration of Independence in its entirety on the western
side of the courtyard; and
- 2 - 009795

(6) Be installed on each campus as required in this section and open to
students, faculty, staff, and visitors by December 31, 2026.
(c) Each display required in subdivisions (b)(2)-(5) must:
(1) Measure, at a minimum, twenty-four inches (24") by thirty-six inches
(36") with a minimum thirty-six-point font size, and be installed so that the center
of the display is no higher than five feet (5') above the ground;
(2) Include "Charlie Kirk Memorial Courtyard for Civil Debate" and
"September 10, 2025" at the top or bottom of the display; and
(3) Be constructed in a manner and of materials designed to withstand
the weather conditions of the area in which it is located.
(d) The board of regents, each state university board, and the board of trustees
for the University of Tennessee system may receive and use gifts, donations, and grants
of money, property, and services for purposes of designing, installing, and maintaining a
Charlie Kirk Memorial Courtyard for Civil Debate.
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 009795